Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 12. Environmental Quality.

§§ 10.1-1200 through 10.1-1212.

Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 887.

§§ 10.1-1213 through 10.1-1221.

Repealed by Acts 1992, cc. 464 and 887.

Cross references.

For Department of Environmental Quality, see §

10.1-1182

et seq.

For present provisions relating to the Virginia Fish Passage Grant and Revolving Loan Fund, see § 29.1-101.2 et seq.